Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-136
Research Excellence Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Research Excellence Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the University of Nebraska. The fund shall consist of money from gifts, grants, or bequests designated for the fund and transfers authorized by the Legislature. The fund may be used to support research-based investments in data, data collection, and ongoing research critical to the Nebraska economy, including, but not limited to, the Nebraska Mesonet system. No money appropriated or transferred from the fund shall be used for electronic-related equipment or electronic-related components manufactured or supplied by a foreign adversary as identified in 15 C.F.R. 791.4, as such regulation existed on February 7, 2025, for data gathering equipment that will be or is located within a ten-mile radius of a military installation as defined in section 70-1001.01. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2025, LB36, § 35.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.